hi_android/foma/magyar.lexc
!!!magyar.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper  +Pot 
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+ +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
                  +Vbpfx[gcat] +Noun[gcat] [Guess] [stem]
                  +Sg[lfea] +Pl[lfea] +PREP[gcat] +ADV[gcat] +A[gcat]
                  +Aux[lfea] +RPRO[gcat] +Relative[lfea] +NEG[gcat]
                  +Constant[lfea]

#begin insertion from enhufnevek.lexc
+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sue +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §ooez3§ §oeoe§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoez5§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §JJ§ §JPJ§ §VVH§ §VVdzs§

§ooez18§ §uue2§ §EOA17§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§
#end insertion from enhufnevek.lexc

§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§felteo§ §j§ §szorelol§ §tatt§ §sj§ §sj3§ §igeoe§ §igeoue§
§AAmely§ §AAAmely§ §igeamely§ §igeomely§ §igeo2mely§ §igeumely§ §felteo1§ §igeuomely§
§igejakik1mely§ §igejatokitek1mely§ §igeija1mely§ §igeaamely§ §igetattetmely§
§felteomely§ §szorelolmely§ §felteo3§ §l§
§igeoo§ §igeoomely§

LEXICON Root
Noun;
Verb;
Vbpfx;

LEXICON Vbpfx
fel AddVbpfx;
be AddVbpfx;
ki AddVbpfx;

LEXICON AddVbpfx
[stem]+Vbpfx[gcat]:0	#;

LEXICON Verb
hív AddVerbmely;
kapcsol AddVerbmely;

LEXICON AddVerbmely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repmely;
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     #;

LEXICON Repmely
Imper1mely;

LEXICON Imper1mely
Nrep1mely;

LEXICON Nrep1mely
NImper1mely;

LEXICON NImper1mely
Pot1mely;

LEXICON Pot1mely
Case1mely;

LEXICON Case1mely
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;

LEXICON Noun
[Guess] Constant;

LEXICON Constant
[stem]+CON[gcat]:0	Object;

LEXICON Object
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
